Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202677-4402
Purpose of act; legislative findings.

(1) The purpose of the Good Life Transformational Projects Act is to promote and develop the general and economic welfare of this state and its communities by providing support for unique Nebraska projects that will attract new industries and employment opportunities and further grow and strengthen Nebraska's retail, entertainment, and tourism industries.

(2) The Legislature finds that it will be beneficial to the economic well-being of the people of this state to encourage transformational development projects within the state that create jobs, infrastructure, and other improvements and attract and retain tourists and college graduates from around the state.

(3) The Legislature further finds that such projects will (a) generate new economic activity, as well as additional state and local taxes from persons residing within and outside the state, (b) create new economic opportunities and jobs for residents, and (c) promote new-to-market retail, entertainment, and dining attractions.

Laws 2023, LB727, § 10.